Utah statutes.
63M-1-903.   Industrial Assistance Account created.
(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as
the "Industrial Assistance Account" of which:
(a)  up to 50% shall be used in economically disadvantaged rural areas; and
(b)  up to 25% may be used to take timely advantage of economic opportunities
as they arise.
(2)  The restricted account shall be administered by the administrator under
the policy direction of the board.
(3)  The administrator may hire appropriate support staff.
(4)  The cost of administering the restricted account shall be paid from money
in the restricted account.
(5)  Interest accrued from investment of money in the restricted account shall
remain in the restricted account.
